bg: Аматричана
fr: Sauce tomate à la pancetta
it: Amatriciana, Sugo all'amatriciana
ja: アマトリチャーナ

en: Carbonara sauces, Cream sauce with lardoons
fr: Sauces carbonara, Sauce carbonara
hr: Carbonara umaci
ja: カルボナーラ
lt: Carbonara padažai

en: Bolognese sauces, Bolognese sauce
bg: Сос Болонезе
de: Bolognese-Soße, Bolognese-Soßen, Bolognese-Saucen, Bolognese-Sauce
es: Salsas boloñesas, Boloñesas
fi: bolognaise-kastikeet
fr: Sauces bolognaises, sauce bolognaise, Bolognese, Bolognaises, Bolognaise
hr: Bolognese umaci
hu: Bolonyai szósz
it: Sughi alla bolognese
ja: ボロネーゼ
lt: Bolonijos padažai
nl: Bolognaisesauzen, Bolognesesauzen
pl: Sosy bolońskie, Sosy Bolognese, Sos boloński, Sos Bolognese
pt: Molhos de bolonhesa

en: Dried meat-based pasta sauces
nl: Gedroogde pastasuazen met vlees

en: Meats and their products, Meat-based products
bg: Месни продукти
ca: Productes amb base de carn
da: Kødbaserede produkter
de: Auf Fleisch basierende Lebensmittel
es: Productos a base de carne
fi: lihapohjaiset tuotteet
fr: Viandes et dérivés, Produits à la viande, produits à base de viande
he: מוצרים מבוססי בשר
hr: Mesa i njihovih proizvoda
hu: Hús alapú ételek
it: Prodotti a base di carne
ja: 肉とその製品、肉ベースの製品
ko: 고기와 그 제품, 고기 기반 제품
lt: Mėsos produktai
nl: Vleesproducten
no: Kjøtt og kjøttprodukter, Kjøttbaserte produkter
pl: Produkty na bazie mięsa
pt: Produtos à base de carne
ru: Продукты из мяса
sv: Kött och dess produkter, Köttbaserade produkter
tr: Et ürünleri
zh: 肉制品

en: Marinated meats
fr: Viandes marinées

en: Andorran meat products
fr: Produits carnés andorrins
zh: 安道尔肉制品

en: Belgian meat products
de: Belgische Fleischprodukte
fr: Produits carnés belges
hr: Belgijski mesni proizvodi
lt: Belgiški mėsos produktai

en: Czech meat products
bg: Чешки месни продукти
fr: Produits carnés tchèques
hr: Češki mesni proizvodi
lt: Čekiški mėsos produktai
pl: Czeskie produkty mięsne

cs: Pražská šunka
en: Prague ham
fr: Jambon de Prague

en: Jemne parky
cs: Jemné párky

en: Croatian meat products
bg: Хърватски месни продукти
fr: Produits carnés croates
hr: Hrvatske mesne prerađevine
lt: Kroatiški mėsos produktai
pl: Chorwackie produkty mięsne

en: Kulen
az: Kulen
bs: Slavonski kulen
ca: Kulen
cs: Kulen
de: Kulen
el: Κούλεν
fi: Kulen
fr: Kulen
hr: Slavonski kulen, Slavonski kulin, kulen, kulin
hy: Կուլեն
jv: Kulén
mk: Кулен
nl: Kulen
ru: Кулен
sr: Кулен
uk: Кулен

en: Dalmatian hams, Dalmatian prosciutto
hr: Dalmatinski pršut
ko: 달마치야 햄
sh: Dalmatinski pršut
sr: Далматински пршут

en: Cypriot meat products, Meat products from Cyprus
hr: Ciparski mesni proizvodi
lt: Kipro mėsos produktai
pl: Cypryjskie produkty mięsne, Produkty mięsne z Cypru

en: Hiromeri Pitsilias
el: Χοιρομέρι Πιτσιλιάς, Hiromeri Pitsilias

en: Lountza Pitsilias
el: Λούντζα Πιτσιλιάς, Lountza Pitsilias

en: Loukaniko Pitsilias
el: Λουκάνικο Πιτσιλιάς, Loukaniko Pitsilias

en: Pafitiko Loukaniko
el: Παφίτικο Λουκάνικο, Pafitiko Loukaniko

en: Bulgarian meat products
bg: Български месни продукти
fr: Produits carnés bulgares
hr: Bugarski mesni proizvodi
lt: Bulgariški mėsos produktai
pl: Bułgarskie produkty mięsne